Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1073
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Benefit contract shall mean the agreement for provision of benefits authorized by section 44-1087, as that agreement is provided in the certificate described in subsection (1) of section 44-1090;

(2) Benefit member shall mean an adult member who is designated by the laws or rules of the society to be a benefit member under a benefit contract;

(3) Certificate shall mean the document issued as written evidence of the benefit contract;

(4) Laws shall mean the society's articles of incorporation, constitution, and bylaws, however designated;

(5) Lodge shall mean subordinate member units of the society, known as camps, courts, councils, or branches or by any other designation;

(6) Premiums shall mean premiums, rates, dues, or other required contributions by whatever name known, which are payable under the certificate;

(7) Rules shall mean all rules, regulations, or resolutions adopted and promulgated by the supreme governing body or board of directors which are intended to have general application to the members of the society; and

(8) Society shall mean fraternal benefit society, unless otherwise indicated.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 2.